Missouri, session 2026, HB3111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 324.1100, 324.1102, 324.1103, 324.1105, 324.1116, 324.1134,
374.051, 374.695, 374.700, 374.702, 374.705, 374.710, 374.711, 374.715, 374.716, 374.717,
374.719, 374.720, 374.730, 374.740, 374.750, 374.755, 374.757, 374.759, 374.760, 374.763,
374.764, 374.770, 374.775, 374.783, 374.784, 374.785, 374.786, 374.787, 374.788, and
374.789, RSMo, are repealed and thirty-six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
as sections 324.1100, 324.1102, 324.1103, 324.1105, 324.1116, 324.1134, 324.2100,
324.2103, 324.2109, 324.2112, 324.2115, 324.2118, 324.2121, 324.2124, 324.2127,
324.2130, 324.2133, 324.2136, 324.2139, 324.2142, 324.2145, 324.2148, 324.2151,
324.2154, 324.2157, 324.2160, 324.2163, 324.2166, 324.2169, 324.2172, 324.2175,
324.2178, 324.2181, 324.2184, 324.2187, and 374.051, to read as follows:
324.1100. As used in sections 324.1100 to 324.1148, the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
established in section 324.1102;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3111 2
(2) "Client", any person who engages the services of a private investigator or a private
fire investigator;
(3) "Department", the department of commerce and insurance;
(4) "Director", the director of the division of professional registration;
(5) "Division", the division of professional registration;
(6) "Insurance adjuster", any person who receives any consideration, either directly or
indirectly, for adjusting in the disposal of any claim under or in connection with a policy of
insurance or engaging in soliciting insurance adjustment business;
(7) "Law enforcement officer", a law enforcement officer as defined in section
556.061;
(8) "Organization", a corporation, trust, estate, partnership, cooperative, or
association;
(9) "Person", an individual or organization;
(10) "Principal place of business", the place where the licensee maintains a permanent
office, which may be a residence or business address;
(11) "Private fire investigation", the furnishing of, making of, or agreeing to make
any investigation of a fire to determine the origin or cause of such fire, or responsibility for
such fire;
(12) "Private fire investigator", any person who receives any consideration, either
directly or indirectly, for engaging in private fire investigation;
(13) "Private fire investigator agency", a person or firm that employees any person to
engage in private fire investigations;
(14) "Private investigator", any person who receives any consideration, either directly
or indirectly, for engaging in the private investigator business;
(15) "Private investigator agency", a person who regularly employs any other person,
other than an organization, to engage in the private investigator business;
(16) "Private investigator business", the furnishing of, making of, or agreeing to
make, any investigation for the purpose of obtaining information pertaining to:
(a) Crimes or wrongs done or threatened against the United States or any state or
territory of the United States;
(b) The identity, habits, conduct, business, occupation, honesty, integrity, credibility,
knowledge, trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement, whereabouts, affiliations,
associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of any person;
(c) The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property;
(d) Securing evidence to be used before any court, board, officer, or investigating
committee;
(e) Sale of personal identification information to the public; or

HCS HB 3111 3
(f) The cause of responsibility for libel, losses, accident, or damage or injury to
persons or property or protection of life or property.
324.1102. 1. The "Board of Private [Investigator and Private Fire Investigator
Examiners] Investigators, Private Fire Investigators, and Professional Surety Bail Bond
Agents" is hereby created within the division of professional registration. The board shall be
a body corporate and may sue and be sued. The board shall guide, advise, and make
recommendations to the division and fulfill all other responsibilities designated by sections
324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187. The duties and responsibilities of
the board with regard to [private fire investigators] professional surety bail bond agents
shall not take full force and effect until such time as the governor appoints the [fire
investigator] bail bond agent members and the appointments are confirmed by the senate.
Members serving on the board of private investigator and private fire investigator
examiners on August 28, [2011] 2026, shall continue to serve on the board, fulfill the term
they were previously appointed for, and be eligible for reappointment.
2. Upon appointment by the governor and confirmation by the senate of the [private
fire investigator] bail bond agent members, the board of private investigator [examiners and
the board of licensed] and private fire investigator examiners [are] is abolished and [their] its
duties and responsibilities shall merge into the board of private [investigator and private fire
investigator examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety
bail bond agents as established pursuant to this section. The board shall be a continuance of
and shall carry out the powers, duties, and functions of the board of private investigator
[examiners and the board of licensed] and private fire investigator examiners.
3. Every act performed in the exercise of such powers, duties, and authorities by or
under the authority of the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond
agents shall be deemed to have the same force and effect as if performed by the board of
private investigator [examiners or the board of licensed] and private fire investigator
examiners.
4. All rules and regulations of the board of private investigator and private fire
investigator examiners and all rules promulgated under sections 374.695 to 374.789 shall
continue to be effective and shall be deemed to be duly adopted rules and regulations of the
board of private [investigator and private fire investigator examiners] investigators, private
fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents until revised, amended, or
repealed by the board. The board shall review such rules and regulations and shall adopt new
rules and regulations as required for the administration of sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and
sections 324.2100 to 324.2187.

HCS HB 3111 4
5. Any person licensed [by the board of private investigator examiners] under
sections 374.695 to 374.789 prior to the appointment by the governor and confirmation by
the senate of the [private fire investigator] professional surety bail bond members of the
board shall be considered licensed by the board.
6. The board shall be composed of [seven] ten members, three members who have
been actively engaged in the private investigator business for the previous five years, two
members who have been actively engaged in private fire investigation for the previous five
years, three members who have been actively engaged in the general bail bond business
or surety recovery for the previous five years, and two public members, appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Each member of the board shall be a
citizen of the United States, a resident of Missouri for at least one year, and a registered voter.
No more than one private investigator [or], private fire investigator, or professional surety
bail bond board member may be employed by, or affiliated with, the same private
investigator agency [or], private fire investigator agency, or bail bond business. The initial
[fire investigator] professional surety bail bond board members shall not be required to be
licensed but shall obtain a license within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of
the rules regarding the licensure of [private fire investigators] professional surety bail bond
agents. The public members shall each be a person who is not and never was a member of
any profession licensed or regulated under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 or sections
324.2100 to 324.2187 or the spouse of such person; and a person who does not have and
never has had a material, financial interest in either the providing of the professional services
regulated by sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 or sections 324.2100 to 324.2187, or an activity
or organization directly related to any profession licensed or regulated under sections
324.1100 to 324.1148 or sections 324.2100 to 324.2187.
7. The members shall be appointed for terms of five years, except of the first two
members appointed who are fire investigators, one member shall be appointed for a term of
five years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Any vacancy on the
board shall be filled for the unexpired term of the member.
8. The members of the board may receive compensation, as determined by the
director for their services, if appropriate, and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenses incurred in performing their official duties on the board.
9. All money held in the board of private investigator and private fire investigator
examiners fund shall be transferred to the "Board of Private [Investigator and Private Fire
Investigator Examiners] Investigators, Private Fire Investigators, and Professional Surety
Bail Bond Agents Fund" which is hereby created. The board of private [investigator and
private fire investigator examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and
professional surety bail bond agents fund shall consist of money collected under sections

HCS HB 3111 5
324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund and may approve disbursements from the fund in accordance with the
provisions of sections 30.170 and 30.180. Upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be
used solely for the administration of sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to
324.2187. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in this
fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of general revenue until the amount in
the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds two times the amount of the appropriation from
the board's funds for the preceding fiscal year or, if the board requires by rule permit renewal
less frequently than yearly, then three times the appropriation from the board's funds for the
preceding fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the fund which shall lapse is that amount in the
fund which exceeds the appropriate multiple of the appropriations from the board's funds for
the preceding fiscal year.
324.1103. For the purposes of sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100
to 324.2187, the division shall:
(1) Employ board personnel, within the limits of the appropriations for that purpose
as established in sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187;
(2) Exercise all administrative functions;
(3) Deposit all fees collected under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections
324.2100 to 324.2187 by transmitting such funds to the department of revenue for deposit in
the state treasury to the credit of the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond
agents fund.
324.1105. 1. The board of private [investigator and private fire investigator
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond
agents may require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of an application seeking
licensure as a private investigator or private fire investigator or as an employee of a private
investigator agency or private fire investigator agency, as such terms are defined in section
324.1100.
2. If the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agentsrequires
that fingerprint submissions be made as part of such application, the board of private
[investigator and private fire investigator examiners] investigators, private fire
investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents shall require applicants to
submit the fingerprints to the Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of conducting a
state and federal fingerprint-based criminal history background check.
3. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state highway
patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the state criminal

HCS HB 3111 6
records repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The Missouri state highway patrol shall
notify the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents of
any criminal history record information or lack of criminal history record information
discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the
contrary, all records related to any criminal history information discovered shall be accessible
and available to the board of private [investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents.
324.1116. A private investigator agency or private fire investigator agency shall not
hire any individual as an employee unless the individual:
(1) Is at least twenty-one years of age;
(2) Provides two recent photographs of themselves, of a type prescribed by the board
[of private investigator examiners];
(3) Has been fingerprinted in a manner approved by the Missouri state highway
patrol, central repository, under section 43.543; and
(4) Complies with any other qualifications and requirements the board adopts by rule.
324.1134. 1. The board may suspend or refuse to issue or renew any certificate of
registration or authority, permit or license required under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 for
one or any combination of causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The board shall notify
the applicant in writing of the reasons for the suspension or refusal and shall advise the
applicant of the applicant's right to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621. As an alternative to a refusal to issue or renew any
certificate, registration or authority, the board may, at its discretion, issue a license which is
subject to probation, restriction or limitation to an applicant for licensure for any one or any
combination of causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The board's order of probation,
limitation or restriction shall contain a statement of the discipline imposed, the basis therefor,
the date such action shall become effective, and a statement that the applicant has thirty days
to request in writing a hearing before the administrative hearing commission. If the board
issues a probationary, limited or restricted license to an applicant for licensure, either party
may file a written petition with the administrative hearing commission within thirty days of
the effective date of the probationary, limited or restricted license seeking review of the
board's determination. If no written request for a hearing is received by the administrative
hearing commission within the thirty-day period, the right to seek review of the board's
decision shall be considered as waived.
2. The board may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any certificate of registration or

HCS HB 3111 7
authority, permit or license required by sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 or any person who has
failed to renew or has surrendered the person's certificate of registration or authority, permit
or license for any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Making any false statement or giving any false information or given any false
information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement
thereof;
(2) Violating any provision of sections 324.1100 to 324.1148;
(3) Violating any rule of the board [of private investigator examiners] adopted under
the authority contained in sections 324.1100 to 324.1148;
(4) Impersonating, or permitting or aiding and abetting an employee to impersonate, a
law enforcement officer, fire safety officer, or employee of the United States of America, or
of any state or political subdivision thereof;
(5) Committing, or permitting any employee to commit any act, while the license was
expired, which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for
the denial of an application for a license;
(6) Knowingly violating, or advising, encouraging, or assisting the violation of, any
court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee;
(7) Using any letterhead, advertisement, or other printed matter, or in any manner
whatever represented that such person is an instrumentality of the federal government, a state,
or any political subdivision thereof;
(8) Using a name different from that under which such person is currently licensed in
any advertisement, solicitation, or contract for business;
(9) Violating or assisting or enabling any person to violate any provision of this
chapter or any lawful rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the authority granted in this
chapter; or
(10) Committing any act which is grounds for denial of an application for a license
under section 324.1112.
3. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence
of such conviction, and a plea or verdict of guilty is deemed to be a conviction within the
meaning thereof.
4. The agency may continue under the direction of another employee if the licensee's
license is suspended or revoked by the board. The board shall establish a time frame in which
the agency shall identify an acceptable person who is qualified to assume control of the
agency, as required by the board.
5. After the filing of a complaint before the administrative hearing commission, the
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a
finding by the administrative hearing commission that the grounds in subsection [1] 2 of this

HCS HB 3111 8
section for disciplinary action are met, the board may singly or in combination censure or
place the person named in the complaint on probation under such terms and conditions as the
board deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five years, may suspend for a period not to
exceed three years, or revoke the license.
[374.695.] 324.2100. Sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 may be
known and shall be cited as the "Professional Bail Bondsman and Surety Recovery Agent
Licensure Act".
[374.700.] 324.2103. As used in sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187,
the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Bail bond agent", a surety agent or an agent of a property bail bondsman who is
duly licensed pursuant to the provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to
324.2187, is employed by and is working under the authority of a licensed general bail bond
agent;
(2) "Bail bond or appearance bond", a bond for a specified monetary amount which is
executed by the defendant and a qualified licensee pursuant to sections [374.695 to 374.789]
324.2100 to 324.2187, and which is issued to a court or authorized officer as security for the
subsequent court appearance of the defendant upon the defendant's release from actual
custody pending the appearance;
(3) "Board", the board of private investigators, private fire investigators, and
professional surety bail bond agents established in section 324.1102 within the division;
(4) "Department", the department of commerce and insurance of the state of
Missouri;
[(4)] (5) "Director", the director of the division of professional registration of the
department of commerce and insurance;
[(5)] (6) "Division", the division of professional registration of the department of
commerce and insurance;
(7) "General bail bond agent", a surety agent or a property bail bondsman, as defined
in sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166, who is licensed in accordance with
sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 and who devotes at least fifty percent of
his or her working time to the bail bond business in this state;
[(6)] (8) "Insurer", any surety insurance company which is qualified by the
department to transact surety business in Missouri;
[(7)] (9) "Licensee", a bail bond agent or a general bail bond agent;
[(8)] (10) "Property bail bondsman", a person who pledges United States currency,
United States postal money orders or cashier's checks or other property as security for a bail
bond in connection with a judicial proceeding, and who receives or is promised therefor
money or other things of value;

HCS HB 3111 9
[(9)] (11) "Surety bail bond agent", any person appointed by an insurer by power of
attorney to execute or countersign bail bonds in connection with judicial proceedings, and
who receives or is promised money or other things of value therefor;
[(10)] (12) "Surety recovery agent", a person not performing the duties of a sworn
peace officer who tracks down, captures and surrenders to the custody of a court a fugitive
who has violated a bail bond agreement, excluding a bail bond agent or general bail bond
agent;
[(11)] (13) "Taking a bail" or "take bail", the acceptance by a person authorized to
take bail of the undertaking of a sufficient surety for the appearance of the defendant
according to the terms of the undertaking or that the surety will pay to the court the sum
specified. Taking of bail or take bail does not include the fixing of the amount of bail and no
person other than a competent court shall fix the amount of bail.
[374.702.] 324.2109. 1. No person shall engage in the bail bond business as a bail
bond agent or a general bail bond agent without being licensed as provided in sections
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166.
2. No judge, attorney, court official, law enforcement officer, state, county, or
municipal employee who is either elected or appointed shall be licensed as a bail bond agent
or a general bail bond agent.
3. A licensed bail bond agent shall not execute or issue an appearance bond in this
state without holding a valid appointment from a general bail bond agent and without
attaching to the appearance bond an executed and prenumbered power of attorney referencing
the general bail bond agent or insurer.
4. A person licensed as an active bail bond agent shall hold the license for at least two
years prior to owning or being an officer of a licensed general bail bond agent.
5. A general bail bond agent shall not engage in the bail bond business:
(1) Without having been licensed as a general bail bond agent pursuant to sections
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166; or
(2) Except through an agent licensed as a bail bond agent pursuant to sections
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166.
6. A general bail bond agent shall not permit any unlicensed person to solicit or
engage in the bail bond business on the general bail bond agent's behalf, except for
individuals who are employed solely for the performance of clerical, stenographic,
investigative, or other administrative duties which do not require a license pursuant to
sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187.
7. Any person who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor. For any subsequent convictions, a person who is convicted of a violation of
this section is guilty of a class E felony.

HCS HB 3111 10
[374.705.] 324.2112. 1. The [department shall administer and enforce the provisions
of sections 374.695 to 374.789, prescribe the duties of its officers and employees with respect
to sections 374.695 to 374.789, and] board shall promulgate, pursuant to [section 374.045
and] chapter 536, such rules and regulations within the scope and purview of the provisions of
sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 as the [director] board considers
necessary and proper for the effective administration and interpretation of the provisions of
sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187.
2. The [director] board shall set the amount of all fees authorized and required by the
provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 by rules and regulations
promulgated pursuant to chapter 536. All such fees shall be set at a level designed to produce
revenue which shall not substantially exceed the cost and expense of administering the
provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187. [However, such fees shall
not exceed one hundred fifty dollars every two years for biennial licenses and renewable
licenses for general bail bond agents as provided for in section 374.710.]
3. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
[374.710.] 324.2115. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections [374.695 to
374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166, no person or other entity shall practice as a bail bond agent
or general bail bond agent, as defined in section [374.700] 324.2103, in Missouri unless and
until the [department] boardhas issued to him or her a license, to be renewed every two years
as hereinafter provided, to practice as a bail bond agent or general bail bond agent.
2. An applicant for a bail bond and general bail bond agent license shall submit with
the application proof that he or she has received twenty-four hours of initial basic training in
areas of instruction in subjects determined by the [director] board deemed appropriate to
professionals in the bail bond profession. Bail bond agents and general bail bond agents who
are licensed at the date which this act becomes law shall be exempt from such twenty-four
hours of initial basic training.
3. In addition to the twenty-four hours of initial basic training to become a bail bond
agent or general bail bond agent, there shall be eight hours of biennial continuing education
for all bail bond agents and general bail bond agents to maintain their state license. The
[director] board shall determine said appropriate areas of instruction for said biennial

HCS HB 3111 11
continuing education. The [director] board shall determine which institutions, organizations,
associations, and individuals shall be eligible to provide the initial basic training and the
biennial continuing education instruction. The [department] board may allow state
institutions, organizations, associations, or individuals to provide courses for the initial basic
training and the biennial continuing education training. [The cost shall not exceed two
hundred dollars for the initial basic training and one hundred fifty dollars for biennial
continuing education.]
4. Upon completion of said basic training or biennial continuing education and the
licensee meeting the other requirements as provided under sections [374.695 to 374.789]
324.2100 to 324.2187, the [director] board shall issue a two-year license for the bail bond
agent or general bail bond agent [for a fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars].
5. Nothing in sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166 shall be construed
to prohibit any person from posting or otherwise providing a bail bond in connection with any
legal proceeding, provided that such person receives no fee, remuneration or consideration
therefor.
[374.711.] 324.2118. 1. The [department of commerce and insurance] board of
private investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
may require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of an application seeking a license,
or renewal of a license, for and as a general bail bond agent, a bail bond agent, or a surety
recovery agent, as such terms are defined in section [374.700] 324.2103.
2. If the [department of commerce and insurance] board of private investigators,
private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents requires that
fingerprint submissions be made as part of such application, the [department of commerce
and insurance] board of private investigators, private fire investigators, and professional
surety bail bond agents shall require applicants to submit the fingerprints to the Missouri
state highway patrol for the purpose of conducting a state and federal fingerprint-based
criminal history background check.
3. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state highway
patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the state criminal
records repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The Missouri state highway patrol shall
notify the [department] board of private investigators, private fire investigators, and
professional surety bail bond agents of any criminal history record information or lack of
criminal history record information discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all records related to any criminal history
information discovered shall be accessible and available to the [department] board of private
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents.

HCS HB 3111 12
[374.715.] 324.2121. 1. Applications for examination and licensure as a bail bond
agent or general bail bond agent shall be in writing and on forms prescribed and furnished by
the [department] board, and shall contain such information as the [department] board
requires. Each application shall be accompanied by proof satisfactory to the [department]
boardthat the applicant is a citizen of the United States, has a high school diploma or general
education development certificate (GED), is of good moral character, and meets the
qualifications for surety on bail bonds as provided by supreme court rule. Each application
shall be accompanied by the examination and application fee set by the [department] board.
Individuals currently employed as bail bond agents and general bail bond agents shall not be
required to meet the education requirements needed for licensure pursuant to this section.
2. In addition, each applicant for licensure as a general bail bond agent shall furnish
proof satisfactory to the [department] board that the applicant or, if the applicant is a
corporation, that each officer thereof has completed at least two years as a bail bond agent,
and that the applicant possesses liquid assets of at least ten thousand dollars, along with a duly
executed assignment of ten thousand dollars to the state of Missouri. The assignment shall
become effective upon the applicant's violating any provision of sections [374.695 to
374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187. The assignment required by this section shall be in the form
and executed in the manner prescribed by the [department] board. The [director] board may
require by regulation conditions by which additional assignments of assets of the general bail
bond agent may occur when the circumstances of the business of the general bail bond agent
warrants additional funds. However, such additional funds shall not exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars.
[374.716.] 324.2124. 1. Every bail bond agent shall account for each power of
attorney assigned by the general bail bond agent on a weekly basis and remit all sums
collected and owed to the general bail bond agent pursuant to his or her written contract. The
general bail bond agent shall maintain the weekly accounting and remittance records for a
period of three years. Such records shall be subject to inspection by the [director or his or her
designee] board during regular business hours or at other reasonable times.
2. For every bond written in this state, the licensee shall provide to the principal a
copy of the bail contract.
[374.717.] 324.2127. No insurer or licensee, court, or law enforcement officer shall:
(1) Pay a fee or rebate or give or promise anything of value in order to secure a
settlement, compromise, remission, or reduction of the amount of any bail bond to:
(a) A jailer, police officer, peace officer, committing judge, or any other person who
has power to arrest or to hold in custody any person; or
(b) Any public official or public employee;

HCS HB 3111 13
(2) Pay a fee or rebate or give anything of value to an attorney in bail bond matters,
except in defense of any action on a bond;
(3) Pay a fee or rebate or give anything of value to the principal or anyone on the
principal's behalf;
(4) Accept anything of value from a principal except the premium and expenses
incurred, provided that the licensee shall be permitted to accept collateral security or other
indemnity from the principal in accordance with the provisions of section [374.719]
324.2130.
[374.719.] 324.2130. 1. A licensee may accept collateral security from the principal
in a fiduciary capacity, which collateral shall be returned upon final termination of liability on
the bond. When a licensee accepts collateral, the licensee shall provide a prenumbered
written receipt, which shall include a detailed account of the collateral received by the
licensee. The acceptance of collateral security by a bail bond agent shall be reported to the
general bail bond agent.
2. The collateral security required by the licensee shall be reasonable in relation to the
amount of the bond.
3. If a failure to appear, absconding or attempting to abscond, or a judgment of
forfeiture on the bond has occurred, the collateral security may be used to reimburse the
licensee for any costs and expenses incurred associated with the forfeiture.
4. The general bail bond agent shall retain records of the acceptance, return, or
judgment of forfeiture resulting in the use of the collateral to reimburse the licensee for a
period of three years.
[374.720.] 324.2133. 1. Each applicant for licensure as a general bail bond agent,
after complying with this section and the provisions of section [374.715] 324.2121, shall be
issued a license by the [department] board unless grounds exist under section [374.755]
324.2145 for denial of a license.
2. Each applicant for examination and licensure as a bail bond agent, after complying
with the provisions of section [374.715] 324.2121, shall appear for examination at the time
and place specified by the [department] board. Such examination shall be as prescribed by
the [director as provided under section 375.018] board and shall be designed to test the
applicant's knowledge and expertise in the area of surety bonds in general and the practice of
a bail bond agent, as defined in sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166, in
particular. The applicant shall be notified of the result of the examination within twenty
working days of the examination. Any applicant who fails such examination may, upon
reapplication and payment of the reexamination fee set by the [department] board, retake the
examination.

HCS HB 3111 14
[374.730.] 324.2136. All licenses issued to bail bond agents and general bail bond
agents under the provisions of sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 shall be
renewed biennially, which renewal shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the
[department] board and shall be accompanied by the renewal fee set by the [department]
board.
[374.740.] 324.2139. Any person applying to be licensed as a nonresident general bail
bond agent who has been licensed in another state shall devote fifty percent of his or her
working time in the state of Missouri and shall file proof with the [director of the department
of commerce and insurance] board as to his or her compliance, and accompany his or her
application with the fees set by the [director] board by regulation and, if applying for a
nonresident general bail bond agent's license, with a duly executed assignment of twenty-five
thousand dollars to the state of Missouri, which assignment shall become effective upon the
applicant's violating any provision of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187.
Failure to comply with this section will result in revocation of the nonresidence license. The
assignment required by this section shall be in the form and executed in the manner
prescribed by the [department] board. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall be
subject to the same renewal requirements set for other licenses issued pursuant to sections
[374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187.
[374.750.] 324.2142. The [department] board may refuse to issue or renew any
license required pursuant to sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 for any one
or any combination of causes stated in section [374.755] 324.2145. The [department] board
shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant
of his or herright to file a complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided
by chapter 621.
[374.755.] 324.2145. 1. The [department] board may cause a complaint to be filed
with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of
any license required by sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166 or any person
who has failed to renew or has surrendered his or her license for any one or any combination
of the following causes:
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in chapter 195, or alcoholic beverage
to an extent that such use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of the profession
licensed under sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166;
(2) Final adjudication or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere within the past fifteen
years in a criminal prosecution under any state or federal law for a felony or a crime involving
moral turpitude whether or not a sentence is imposed, prior to issuance of license date;

HCS HB 3111 15
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or bribery in securing any license or in
obtaining permission to take any examination required pursuant to sections [374.695 to
374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any compensation as a member of the
profession licensed by sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166 by means of
fraud, deception or misrepresentation;
(5) Misappropriation of the premium, collateral, or other things of value given to a
bail bond agent or a general bail bond agent for the taking of bail, incompetency, misconduct,
gross negligence, fraud, or misrepresentation in the performance of the functions or duties of
the profession licensed or regulated by sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166;
(6) Violation of any provision of or any obligation imposed by the laws of this state,
[department of commerce and insurance] board rules and regulations, or aiding or abetting
other persons to violate such laws, orders, rules or regulations, or subpoenas;
(7) Transferring a license or permitting another person to use a license of the licensee;
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a license or other right to practice the
profession regulated by sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 granted by
another state, territory, federal agency or country upon grounds for which revocation or
suspension is authorized in this state;
(9) Being finally adjudged insane or incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice the profession
licensed or regulated by sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 who is not
currently licensed and eligible to practice pursuant to sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100
to 324.2187;
(11) Acting in the capacity of an attorney at a trial or hearing of a person for whom
the attorney is acting as surety;
(12) Failing to provide a copy of the bail contract, renumbered written receipt for
acceptance of money, or other collateral for the taking of bail to the principal, if requested by
any person who is a party to the bail contract, or any person providing funds or collateral for
bail on the principal's behalf.
2. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that one or more of the causes stated in subsection 1 of this section have been
met, the [director] board may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person
named in the complaint on probation under such terms and conditions as the board
deems appropriate or suspend or revoke the license [or enter into an agreement for a
monetary or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.

HCS HB 3111 16
3. In lieu of filing a complaint at the administrative hearing commission, the director
and the bail bond agent or general bail bond agent may enter into an agreement for a monetary
or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
4. In addition to any other remedies available, the director may issue a cease and
desist order or may seek an injunction in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the
provisions of section 374.046 whenever it appears that any person is acting as a bail bond
agent or general bail bond agent without a license or violating any other provisions of sections
374.695 to 374.789].
[374.757.] 324.2148. 1. Any agent licensed by sections [374.695 to 374.775]
324.2100 to 324.2166 who intends to apprehend any person in this state shall inform law
enforcement authorities in the city or county in which such agent intends such apprehension,
before attempting such apprehension. Such agent shall present to the local law enforcement
authorities a certified copy of the bond and all other appropriate paperwork identifying the
principal and the person to be apprehended. Local law enforcement may accompany the
agent. Failure of any agent to whom this section applies to comply with the provisions of this
section shall be a class A misdemeanor for the first violation and a class E felony for
subsequent violations; and shall also be a violation of section [374.755] 324.2145 and may in
addition be punished pursuant to that section.
2. The surety recovery agent shall inform the local law enforcement in the county or
city where such agent is planning to enter a residence. Such agent shall have a certified copy
of the bond and all appropriate paperwork to identify the principal. Local law enforcement,
when notified, may accompany the surety recovery agent to that location to keep the peace if
an active warrant is effective for a felony or misdemeanor. If a warrant is not active, the local
law enforcement officers may accompany the surety recovery agent to such location. Failure
to report to the local law enforcement agency is a class A misdemeanor. For any subsequent
violations, failure to report to the local law enforcement agency is a class E felony.
[374.759.] 324.2151. 1. Any bail bond agent licensed in the state of Missouri shall
have access to all publicly available court records of the defendant by available means to
make a realistic assessment of the defendant's probability of attending all court dates as set in
his or her charges relating to the bond request.
2. Any defendant shall have free access to any bail bond agent via one phone call so
long as the call is made to a local phone number. All other numbers may be available as a
collect call to any nonlocal number.
3. All Missouri licensed bail bond agents or licensed general agents shall be qualified,
without further requirements, in all jurisdictions of this state, as provided in rules
promulgated by the supreme court of Missouri and not by any circuit court rule.

HCS HB 3111 17
[374.760.] 324.2154. Each general bail bond agent shall file, between the first and
tenth day of each month, sworn affidavits with the [department] board stating that there are
no unsatisfied judgments against him or her. Such affidavits shall be in the form and manner
prescribed by the [department] board.
[374.763.] 324.2157. 1. If any final judgment ordering forfeiture of a defendant's
bond is not paid within a six-month period of time, the court shall extend the judgment date or
notify the [department] board of the failure to satisfy such judgment. The [director] board
shall draw upon the assets of the surety, remit the sum to the court, and obtain a receipt of
such sum from the court. The [director] board may take action as provided by section
[374.755] 324.2145, regarding the license of the surety and any bail bond agents writing upon
the surety's liability.
2. The [department] board shall furnish to the presiding judge of each circuit court of
this state, on at least a monthly basis, a list of all duly licensed and qualified bail bond agents
and general bail bond agents whose licenses are not subject to pending suspension or
revocation proceedings, and who are not subject to unsatisfied bond forfeiture judgments. In
lieu of such list, the [department] boardmay provide this information to each presiding judge
in an electronic format.
3. All duly licensed and qualified bail bond agents and general bail bond agents shall
be qualified, without further requirement, to write bail upon a surety's liability in all courts of
this state as provided in rules promulgated by the supreme court of Missouri and not by any
circuit court rule.
[374.764.] 324.2160. 1. The [director] board shall examine and inquire into all
alleged violations or complaints filed with the [department of commerce and insurance]
boardof the bail bond law of the state, and inquire into and investigate the bail bond business
transacted in the state by any bail bond agent, general bail bond agent, or surety recovery
agent.
2. The [director or any of his or her duly appointed agents] board may compel the
attendance before [him or her] the board, and may examine, under oath, the directors,
officers, bail bond agents, general bail bond agents, surety recovery agents, employees, or any
other person in reference to the condition, affairs, management of the bail bond or surety
recovery business, or any matters relating thereto. [He or she] The board may administer
oaths or affirmations and shall have power to summon and compel the attendance of
witnesses and to require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or
other documents if necessary.
3. [The director may make and conduct the investigation in person or the director may
appoint one or more persons to make and conduct the investigation. If made by a person
other than the director, the person duly appointed by the director shall have the same powers

HCS HB 3111 18
as granted to the director pursuant to this section. A certificate of appointment under the
official seal of the director shall be sufficient authority and evidence thereof for the person to
act.] For the purpose of making the investigations, or having the same made, the [director]
board may employ the necessary clerical, actuarial, and other assistance.
[374.770.] 324.2163. 1. If there is a breach of the contract of the bond, the court in
which the case is pending shall declare a bond forfeiture, unless the surety upon such bond
informs the court that the defendant is incarcerated somewhere within the United States. If
forfeiture is not ordered because the defendant is incarcerated somewhere within the United
States, the surety is responsible for the return of the defendant. If bond forfeiture is ordered
and the surety can subsequently prove the defendant is incarcerated somewhere within the
United States, then the bond forfeiture shall be set aside and the surety be responsible for the
return of the defendant. When the surety notifies the court of the whereabouts of the
defendant, a hold order shall be placed by the court having jurisdiction on the defendant in the
state in which the defendant is being held.
2. In all instances in which a bail bond agent or general bail bond agent duly licensed
by sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 has given his or her bond for bail for
any defendant who has absented himself in violation of the condition of such bond, the bail
bond agent or general bail bond agent shall have the first opportunity to return such defendant
to the proper court. If he or she is unable to return such defendant, the state of Missouri shall
return such defendant to the proper court for prosecution, and all costs incurred by the state in
so returning a defendant may be levied against the bail bond agent or general bail bond agent
in question.
[374.775.] 324.2166. When issuing bonds of one thousand dollars or less, licensed
bail bond agents or general bail bond agents may charge a minimum premium of fifty dollars.
In connection with such bonds no bail bond agent, general bail bond agent, or corporation
shall charge or receive any additional fee for investigations or services rendered in connection
with the execution of the bond.
[374.783.] 324.2169. 1. No person shall hold himself or herself out as being a surety
recovery agent in this state, unless such person is licensed in accordance with the provisions
of sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187. Licensed bail bond agents and
general bail bond agents may perform fugitive recovery without being licensed as a surety
recovery agent.
2. The [director] board shall have authority to license all surety recovery agents in
this state. The [director] board shall have control and supervision over the licensing of such
agents and the enforcement of the terms and provisions of sections [374.783 to 374.789]
324.2169 to 324.2187.
3. The [director] board shall have the power to:

HCS HB 3111 19
(1) Set and determine the amount of the fees authorized and required pursuant to
sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187. The fees shall be set at a level sufficient
to produce revenue which shall not substantially exceed the cost and expense of administering
sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187[. However, such fees shall not exceed
one hundred fifty dollars for a two-year license]; and
(2) Determine the sufficient qualifications of applicants for a license.
4. The [director] board shall license for a period of two years all surety recovery
agents in this state who meet the requirements of sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to
324.2187.
[374.784.] 324.2172. 1. Applications for examination and licensure as a surety
recovery agent shall be submitted on forms prescribed by the [department] board and shall
contain such information as the [department] board requires, along with a copy of the front
and back of a photographic identification card.
2. Each application shall be accompanied by proof satisfactory to the [director] board
that the applicant is a citizen of the United States and has a high school diploma or a general
educational development certificate (GED). An applicant shall furnish evidence of such
person's qualifications by completing an approved surety recovery agent course with at least
twenty-four hours of initial minimum training. The [director] board shall determine which
institutions, organizations, associations, and individuals shall be eligible to provide said
training. Said instructions and fees associated therewith shall be identical or similar to those
prescribed in section [374.710] 324.2115 for bail bond agents and general bail bond agents.
3. In addition to said twenty-four hours of initial minimum training, licensees shall be
required to receive eight hours of biennial continuing education of which said instructions and
fees shall be identical or similar to those prescribed in section [374.710] 324.2115 for bail
bond agents and general bail bond agents.
4. Applicants for surety recovery agents licensing shall be exempt from said
requirements of the twenty-four hours of initial minimum training if applicants provide proof
of prior training as a law enforcement officer with at least two years of such service within the
ten years prior to the application being submitted to the [department] board.
5. The [director] board may refuse to issue any license pursuant to sections [374.783
to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187, for any one or any combination of causes stated in section
[374.787] 324.2181. The [director] board shall notify the applicant in writing of the reason
or reasons for refusal and shall advise the applicant of the right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission to appeal the refusal as provided by chapter 621.
[374.785.] 324.2175. For the purpose of surrender of the defendant, a surety recovery
agent may apprehend the defendant anywhere within the state of Missouri before or after the
forfeiture of the undertaking without personal liability for false imprisonment or may

HCS HB 3111 20
empower any surety recovery agent to make apprehension by providing written authority
endorsed on a certified copy of the undertaking and paying the lawful fees.
[374.786.] 324.2178. 1. Every person licensed pursuant to sections [374.783 to
374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187 shall, before the license renewal date, apply to the [director]
board for renewal for the ensuing licensing period. The application shall be made on a form
furnished to the applicant and shall state the applicant's full name, the applicant's business
address, the address at which the applicant resides, the date the applicant first received a
license, and the applicant's surety recovery agent identification number, if any.
2. A renewal form shall be mailed to each person licensed in this state at the person's
last known address. The failure to mail the renewal form or the failure of a person to receive
it does not relieve any person of the duty to be licensed and to pay the license fee required nor
exempt such person from the penalties provided for failure to be licensed.
3. Each applicant for renewal shall accompany such application with a renewal fee to
be paid to the [department] board for the licensing period for which renewal is sought.
4. The [director] board may refuse to renew any license required pursuant to sections
[374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187 for any one or any combination of causes stated
in section [374.787] 324.2181. The [director] board shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for refusal to renew and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a
complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
[374.787.] 324.2181. 1. The [director] board may cause a complaint to be filed with
the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any surety
recovery agent or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered his or her license for
any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Violation of any provisions of, or any obligations imposed by, the laws of this
state, [the department of commerce and insurance] board rules and regulations, or aiding or
abetting other persons to violate such laws, orders, rules, or regulations;
(2) Final adjudication or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution
under state or federal law for a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude, whether or not a
sentence is imposed;
(3) Using fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing a license or in
obtaining permission to take any examination required by sections [374.783 to 374.789]
324.2169 to 324.2187;
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any compensation as a surety recovery agent by
means of fraud, deception, or misrepresentation;
(5) Acting as a surety recovery agent or aiding or abetting another in acting as a
surety recovery agent without a license;

HCS HB 3111 21
(6) Incompetence, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, or misrepresentation in the
performance of the functions or duties of a surety recovery agent;
(7) Having a license revoked or suspended that was issued by another state.
2. After the filing of the complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission
that one or more of the causes stated in subsection 1 of this section have been met, the
[director] board may, singly or in combination, censure or place the person named in the
complaint on probation under such terms and conditions as the board deems
appropriate or suspend or revoke the license [or enter into an agreement for a monetary
or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
3. In lieu of filing a complaint with the administrative hearing commission, the
director and the surety recovery agent may enter into an agreement for a monetary or other
penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
4. In addition to any other remedies available, the director may issue a cease and
desist order or may seek an injunction in a court of law pursuant to section 374.046 whenever
it appears that any person is acting as a surety recovery agent without a license].
[374.788.] 324.2184. 1. A [bail bond] surety recovery agent having probable
grounds to believe a subject free on his or her bond has failed to appear as directed by a court,
has breached the terms of the subject's surety agreement, or has taken a substantial step
toward absconding may utilize all lawful means to apprehend the subject. To surrender a
subject to a court, a licensed bail bond or surety recovery agent having probable grounds to
believe the subject is free on his or her bond may:
(1) Detain the subject in a lawful manner, for a reasonable time, provided that in the
event travel from another state is involved, the detention period may include reasonable travel
time not to exceed seventy-two hours;
(2) Transport a subject in a lawful manner from state to state and county to county to
a place of authorized surrender; and
(3) Enter upon private or public property in a lawful manner to execute apprehension
of a subject.
2. A surety recovery agent who apprehends a subject pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section shall surrender custody of the subject to the court of jurisdiction.
3. When a surety recovery agent is in the process of performing fugitive recovery, a
photographic identification card shall be prominently displayed on his or her person.
[374.789.] 324.2187. 1. A person is guilty of a class E felony if he or she does not
hold a valid surety recovery agent license or a bail bond license and commits any of the
following acts:

HCS HB 3111 22
(1) Holds himself or herself out to be a licensed surety recovery agent within this
state;
(2) Claims that he or she can render surety recovery agent services; or
(3) Engages in fugitive recovery in this state.
2. Any person who engages in fugitive recovery in this state and wrongfully causes
damage to any person or property, including, but not limited to, unlawful apprehension,
unlawful detainment, or assault, shall be liable for such damages and may be liable for
punitive damages.
374.051. 1. Any applicant refused a license or the renewal of a license by order of the
director under [sections 374.755, 374.787, and] section 375.141 may file a petition with the
administrative hearing commission alleging that the director has refused the license. The
administrative hearing commission shall conduct hearings and make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in determining whether the applicant may be disqualified by statute.
Notwithstanding section 621.120, the director shall retain discretion in refusing a license or
renewal and such discretion shall not transfer to the administrative hearing commission.
2. If a proceeding is instituted to revoke or suspend a license of any person under
[sections 374.755, 374.787, and] section 375.141, the director shall refer the matter to the
administrative hearing commission by directing the filing of a complaint. The administrative
hearing commission shall conduct hearings and make findings of fact and conclusions of law
in such cases. The director shall have the burden of proving cause for discipline. If cause is
found, the administrative hearing commission shall submit its findings of fact and conclusions
of law to the director, who may determine appropriate discipline.
3. Hearing procedures before the director or the administrative hearing commission
and judicial review of the decisions and orders of the director and of the administrative
hearing commission, and all other procedural matters under this chapter, shall be governed by
the provisions of chapter 536. Hearings before the administrative hearing commission shall
also be governed by the provisions of chapter 621.
✔